Massachusetts, session 194th, H3551.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 116B the following section:-  
SECTION 116C: Smart/wireless utility meter information  
a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:  
(1) “Electromechanical analog meter”, means a purely electric and mechanical device, 
using no electronic components, no switch mode power supply, no transmitter, no antenna, and 
no radio frequency emissions. 
(2) “Utility company”, shall mean an electric, gas, or water company, or town or city 
owned utility or other utility provider.  

of 4 10  (3) “Wireless meter” shall mean: Any transmitting metering device with electronic 
components and/or any electric or battery operated meter that is capable of measuring, recording, 
and sending data by means of a wireless signal from a utility consumer or member to a utility  
company, municipality, or cooperative association in a manner utilizing one-way 
communication, two-way communication, or a combination of one-way and two-way 
communication either through the meter itself or through a device ancillary to the meter. 
Common names include, but are not limited to, AMR, ERT, smart, AMI, and Comprehensive 
Advanced Metering Plan CAMP.  
(4) “Equivalent technology” shall mean utility infrastructure that communicates data 
using wireless frequencies, but which may be undisclosed due to proprietary rights. 
b) The department of public utilities shall direct utility companies to provide ratepayers 
the following:  
(1) a choice of the type of utility meters to be installed and operated on their places of 
residence, property or business; among the choices offered shall be the installation and ongoing  
operation of an "electromechanical analog meter"; and 
(2) the ability to retain and operate an “electromechanical analog meter” on an ongoing 
basis at no cost; and  
(3) the right to replacement of a wireless meter with a non-transmitting electromechanical 
meter at no cost. 
c) The utility companies shall be required to obtain the ratepayer’s written consent:  

of 4 30  (1) before installing wireless meters or "equivalent technology" on the ratepayer’s 
property and  
(2) before altering the functionality of said meters 
d) The utility companies shall provide written notice to ratepayers within 90 days of the 
effective date of this act for the purpose of informing said ratepayers if wireless meters have 
been installed on their properties. Ratepayers shall have the right to request that the utility 
companies remove said wireless meters and install in their place electromechanical analog 
meters that emit no radiofrequency electromagnetic radiation. There shall be no cost or other 
periodic usage charges to the ratepayer for such removal, replacement installation, and use of a 
non-wireless utility meter. The utility company shall promptly comply with such removal and 
replacement installation request made by the ratepayer to said company.  
e) Utility companies are:  
(1) prohibited from shutting off service to a ratepayer based on the ratepayer’s utility 
usage or on the ratepayer having electromechanical analog meters;  
(2) prohibited from imposing any disincentive on a ratepayer for not consenting to the 
installation or use of wireless meters;  
(3) required to notify ratepayers in writing that the installation and use of wireless meters 
are not mandated by state or federal law and are not permitted without the ratepayer’s consent;  
(4) prohibited from discriminating against ratepayers who may have medical conditions 
that are exacerbated by exposures to pulsed microwave radio frequencies; and 

of 4 50  (5) prohibited from installing "equivalent technology", such as direct wireless connection 
to devices in the home or business, on poles or in any other manner near the home or business of 
an individual requesting a non-transmitting meter.  
f) The department of public utilities shall establish terms and conditions to comply with 
the requirements of this section.  
g) This section shall take effect upon its passage.